Massachusetts, session 194th, H947.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any special or general law, or rule or regulation to the contrary, any
community may be granted Brownsfields Assessment and Remediation Funds regardless of the
participation of the Regional Planning Organization.
of 1